Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 2. Professional Registration Requirements.

Sec. 36.90.100.
Contracts for architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services.

The state or a municipality may not award a contract for architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services to

an individual who is not registered under AS 08.48 to perform the architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services required by the contract;

a partnership, except as provided by (3) of this section, that is not qualified under AS

08.48.251

to provide the architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services required by the contract; or

a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership that is not authorized under AS

08.48.241

to offer the architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services required by the contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 38 SLA 2000)